Utah statutes.
26-21-13.   License issued to facility in compliance or substantial compliance with chapter and rules.

(1)  The department shall issue a standard license for a health care facility which is found to be in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and with all applicable rules adopted by the committee.

(2)  The department may issue a provisional or conditional license for a health care facility which is in substantial compliance if the interests of the public will not be jeopardized.



Amended by Chapter 114, 1990 General Session

